Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2470.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1104, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1104. Travel reimbursement and subsistence for members of legislature; claim required A. Notwithstanding section 38-624 38-623, each member of the legislature shall be reimbursed for travel at the federal mileage reimbursement rate as determined annually by the United States general services administration, and such reimbursement shall include travel from the temporary or permanent residence of the member to the state capitol. B. Each member of the legislature shall be paid for each day of subsistence during a regular or special session and for each day of subsistence when the member acts on a legislative matter, other than in a regular or special session, on the prior approval of the presiding officer of the house of which that member is a member. in an amount as follows: 1. For a member whose permanent residence is within Maricopa county, $35. 2. For a member whose permanent residence is outside Maricopa county, Each member shall receive one hundred percent of the average of the six highest months of the annual federal per diem rate for Maricopa county, including lodging, as determined by the United States general services administration. The director of the department of administration shall determine this amount annually. C. Subsistence allowed to each member of the legislature during the regular session as provided in subsection B of this section shall be is limited to the first one hundred twenty days of a regular session. After the first one hundred twenty days of a regular session, each member of the legislature whose permanent residence is within Maricopa county shall be paid the sum of $10 for subsistence for each day of the regular session beyond the first one hundred twenty days.  Each member whose permanent residence is outside of Maricopa county shall receive fifty percent of the amount determined annually by the director of the department of administration pursuant to subsection B of this section for each day beyond the first one hundred twenty days of a regular session as subsistence. D. Each member of the legislature may elect to opt out of receiving subsistence payments prescribed by subsections B and C of this section. E. Each member of the legislature, for authorized travel out of state, shall receive travel and subsistence expenses as prescribed by law for state officers. F. For payment of travel expenses and subsistence, as prescribed by the terms of this section, each member of the legislature shall submit a claim for travel expenses and subsistence that is countersigned by the presiding officer of the respective body. END_STATUTE